District of Columbia statutes.
2-1007

Transfers from predecessor agencies.

All other functions, powers, and duties of the National Capital Park and Planning Commission, including those formerly vested in the Highway Commission established by §§ 9-103.01 to 9-103.04 and 9-103.05 [repealed], and those formerly vested in the National Capital Park Commission by §§ 2-1001, 2-1009, 2-1010, and 2-1011, together with the personnel, records, property, and unexpended balances (available or to be made available) of appropriations, allocations, and all other funds, including trust funds, of the National Capital Park and Planning Commission, are hereby transferred to the Commission.

June 6, 1924, ch. 270, § 9
July 19, 1952, 66 Stat. 790, ch. 949, § 1
1981 Ed., § 1-2007.
1973 Ed., § 1-1009.
Section 9-103.05 was repealed by D.C. Law 4-201, § 711, effective March 10, 1983.